Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4013
Agent's acceptance.

Except as otherwise provided in the power
of attorney, a person accepts appointment as an agent under a power of attorney
by exercising authority or performing duties as an agent or by any other assertion
or conduct indicating acceptance.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 13.